Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.020

Applications—Qualifications—Fees.

(1) Any person not now licensed to practice chiropractic in this state and who desires to practice chiropractic in this state, before it shall be lawful for him or her to do so, shall make application therefor to the secretary, upon such form and in such manner as may be adopted and directed by the secretary. Each applicant who matriculates to a chiropractic college, shall have completed not less than one-half of the requirements for a baccalaureate degree at an accredited and approved college or university and shall be a graduate of a chiropractic school or college accredited and approved by the commission and shall show satisfactory evidence of completion by each applicant of a resident course of study of not less than four thousand classroom hours of instruction in such school or college. Applications shall be in writing and shall be signed by the applicant, and shall recite the history of the applicant as to his or her educational advantages, his or her experience in matters pertaining to a knowledge of the care of the sick, how long he or she has studied chiropractic, under what teachers, what collateral branches, if any, he or she has studied, the length of time he or she has engaged in clinical practice; accompanying the same by reference therein, with any proof thereof in the shape of diplomas, certificates, and shall accompany said application with satisfactory evidence of good character and reputation.

(2) Applicants shall follow administrative procedures and administrative requirements and pay fees as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 2015 c 72 s 7; 1996 c 191 s 8; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 109; 1991 c 3 s 38; 1989 c 258 s 3; 1985 c 7 s 14; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 19; 1974 ex.s. c 97 s 9; 1959 c 53 s 3; 1919 c 5 s 5; RRS s 10100.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 97: See note following RCW 18.25.0192.